Utah statutes.
72-11-106.   Revenue bonds authorized.

To raise funds for the acquisition, financing, construction, reconstruction, improvement, or extension of any of those purposes, projects, and facilities, the committee is authorized to issue revenue bonds in amounts bearing a rate or rates of interest not exceeding 9% per annum, with maturities, in a form and on terms and conditions as it, with the approval of the director of the Division of Finance, considers necessary or convenient.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

